Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 5. Official Bonds, Fines, and Forfeitures.

Collateral references. —

12 Am. Jur. 2d, Bonds, §§ 28-39

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 127- 134,
344- 361,
483- 498.

67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, § 473 et seq.

Public officer’s bond as subject to forfeiture for malfeasance in office, 4 ALR2d 1348.

What period of limitation governs in an action against a public officer and the surety on his official bond, 18 ALR2d 1176.

Time from which interest begins to run on fidelity or public officer’s bond, 57 ALR2d 1317.

Liability on bond of clerk of court, county clerk, or prothonotary for negligent or wrongful acts of deputies or assistants, 71 ALR2d 1140.

Liability of police officer or his bond for injuries or death of third persons resulting from operation of motor vehicle by subordinate, 15 ALR3d 1189.

Liability of notary public or his bond for negligence in performance of duties, 44 ALR3d 555.

Liability of notary public or his bond for wilful or deliberate misconduct in performance of duties, 44 ALR3d 1243.

Sec. 09.55.470.
Suits on undertakings.

The official undertaking or other security of a public officer to the state, a borough, city, town, or other municipal or public corporation of like character therein is considered a security to the state or to the borough, city, town, or other municipal or public corporation, as the case may be, and also to all persons severally for the official delinquency against which it is intended to provide.

When a public officer, by official misconduct or neglect of duty, forfeits the officer’s official undertaking or other security or renders the sureties liable upon the undertaking or other security, a person injured by the misconduct or neglect or who is by law entitled to the benefit of the security may maintain an action thereon in the person’s own name against the officer and the sureties to recover the amount to which the person may be entitled.

History.

(§ 16.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.55.480.
Subsequent actions on same undertaking.

A judgment in favor of a party for one delinquency does not preclude the same or another party from maintaining another action on the same undertaking or other security for another delinquency.

History.

(§ 16.02 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.55.490.
Amount of judgment.

In an action upon an official undertaking or other security, if judgment has already been recovered against the surety therein other than by confession equal in the aggregate to the penalty or a part of the penalty of the undertaking or other security and if the recovery be established on the trial, judgment may not be given against the surety for an amount exceeding the penalty or such portion of the penalty as is not already recovered against the surety.

History.

(§ 16.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.55.500.
Actions for fines or forfeitures.

Fines and forfeitures may be recovered by an action in the name of the state or the officer or person to whom they were given by law, or in the name of the state, officer, or person who is authorized to prosecute for them.

History.

(§ 16.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.55.510.
Amount that may be claimed and recovered.

When an action is commenced for a penalty that by law is not to exceed a certain amount, the action may be commenced for that amount, and, if the judgment is given for the plaintiff, it may be for that amount or less, in the discretion of the court, in proportion to the offense.

History.

(§ 16.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.55.520.
Collusive judgment not a bar to another action.

Recovery of a judgment for a penalty or forfeiture obtained by collusion between the plaintiff and defendant with intent to save the defendant wholly or partially from the consequence contemplated by law in cases where penalty or forfeiture is given wholly or partly to the person who prosecutes, does not bar the recovery of a penalty or forfeiture by another person in a separate action.

History.

(§ 16.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)